Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-923
Cleaning project; county road; benefits; payment; county road fund.

Where any cleaning project benefits a county road, the county board may assess the appropriate share of the costs to the county road fund.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 23, p. 492.